Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.060

Voting by program participant—Use of name or address by county auditor.

The county auditor shall mail a ballot to a program participant qualified and registered at the mailing address provided. Neither the name nor the address of a program participant shall be included in any list of registered voters available to the public.

[ 2011 c 10 s 81; 2008 c 18 s 4; 1991 c 23 s 6.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.